Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2608
Risk manager, defined.

Risk manager shall mean any person who is a full-time employee who deals with matters of insurance within the scope of his or her employment, including the supervision of employee benefits.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 3.